Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 33-26-101.
Short title.

This chapter is known and may be cited as the “Medical Practice Act”.

History.

Laws 1976, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-340.2; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-128; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 143, § 1.

Naturopathy is simply one of the methods of practicing medicine. —

The practice of what is now called naturopathy has from time immemorial, at least to the extent then known, been considered simply as an integral part of the practice of medicine. Hahn v. State, 78 Wyo. 258, 322 P.2d 896,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1958).

It cannot be regarded as a separate and distinct profession. —

Our statute is clear, that the practice of naturopathy cannot be regarded as a separate and distinct profession like that of dentistry for instance, nor can any good reason be given why the legislature may not for the benefit of society require that those who practice the healing art should know and keep up with the improvements and advanced learning in that art. Hahn v. State, 78 Wyo. 258, 322 P.2d 896,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1958).

And legislature had perfect right to refuse to make special regulations. —

It is true that the legislature has licensed dentists and chiropractors and other persons who in some manner attempt to exercise part of the healing art, but simply because the legislature made special regulations for these groups did not require it to make similar regulations concerning naturopaths. It had a perfect right to refuse to provide such regulations relating to them. Hahn v. State, 78 Wyo. 258, 322 P.2d 896,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1958).

And require practitioner to have been admitted to practice as a physician or surgeon. —

The health and well-being of the members of society is too important to justify the failure to make requirements commensurate with the advancement of civilization. There is nothing to prohibit the practice of naturopathy provided that under our statute the practitioner has the learning of a physician and surgeon and has been admitted to practice as such in this state. Such a requirement is valid. Hahn v. State, 78 Wyo. 258, 322 P.2d 896,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1958).

Scope of license to practice medicine or surgery. —

The practice of medicine, in its broadest sense, is the art of healing disease and preserving health, and the license to practice medicine or surgery generally entitles the licensee to practice medicine or surgery in all the various branches and to use any method for treatment and healing human ailments, although others may be authorized to practice in limited fields of the general practice. State v. Catellier, 63 Wyo. 123, 179 P.2d 203,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1947).

Exceeding scope of license as violation. —

A person licensed as a chiropodist who administered a general anesthetic and set a dislocated shoulder was held to have violated this section, defining the practice of medicine. State v. Catellier, 63 Wyo. 123, 179 P.2d 203,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1947).

Prohibited practices. —

Practicing medicine and receiving compensation therefor and practicing medicine without a license are separate offenses under this section. Hahn v. State, 78 Wyo. 258, 322 P.2d 896,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1958).

Matter of sentence in discretion of trial court. —

Matter of sentence in a prosecution under this section for practicing without a license is addressed to the sound discretion of trial court. Hahn v. State, 78 Wyo. 258, 322 P.2d 896,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1958).

Cited

in

Johnson v. State ex rel. Wyoming Bd. of Medicine, 986 P.2d 157,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

See note, “What Constitutes the Practice of Medicine in Wyoming,” 13 Wyo. L.J. 259.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutionality and construction of statutes or regulations prohibiting one who has no license to practice medicine from owning, maintaining, or operating an office therefor, 20 ALR2d 808.

Illegal practice of medicine under statute, ordinance, or other measure involving chemical treatment of public water supply, 43 ALR2d 453.

Hypnotism as illegal practice of medicine, 85 ALR2d 1128.

Single or isolated transaction as falling within provisions of licensing requirements, 93 ALR2d 90.

Practicing medicine, surgery, dentistry, optometry, podiatry, or other healing arts without license as a separate or continuing offense, 99 ALR2d 654.

Acupuncture as illegal practice of medicine, 72 ALR3d 1257.

Right of medical patient to obtain, or physician to prescribe, Laetrile for treatment of illness — state cases, 5 ALR4th 219.

Regulation of practice of acupuncture, 17 ALR4th 964.

Standard of care owed to patient by medical specialist as determined by local, “like community,” state, national, or other standards, 18 ALR4th 603.

Medical malpractice: Who are “health care providers,” or the like, whose actions fall within statutes specifically governing actions and damages for medical malpractice, 12 ALR5th 1.

Validity, construction and application of state statutory provisions limiting amount of recovery in medical malpractice claims, 26 ALR5th 245.

Coverage of professional liability or indemnity policy for sexual contact with patients by physicians, surgeons, and other healers, 60 ALR5th 239.

§ 33-26-102.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 143, § 2.

“A.O.A.” means the American Osteopathic Association;

“Board” means the Wyoming state board of medicine;

“Errant conduct” means conduct by a licensee which may constitute grounds for discipline as set forth in this act;

“Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 143, § 2.

“Health care entity” means any hospital, clinic, training program, professional society or committee of physicians or other licensed health care practitioners that follows a peer review process for the purpose of furthering quality health care;

“Impaired” means a person who is unable to practice medicine with reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason of one (1) or more of the following:

Medical incompetence;

Mental illness;

Physical illness, including but not limited to deterioration through the aging process or loss of motor skill;

Chemical or alcohol impairment, addiction, dependence or abuse.

“Lapsed” means the status of a license when the licensee fails to renew the license by July 1 of any year or when the holder of a temporary license fails to appear for an interview at the next board meeting following the date of issuance or fails to submit a written request for extension of a temporary license or when a written request for extension is not approved by the board;

“License” means a license to practice medicine in this state issued by the board pursuant to this chapter;

“Licensee” means any person licensed by the board under this chapter;

“Practicing medicine” means any person who in any manner:

Advertises, holds out, or represents to the public that he is authorized to practice medicine in this state; or

Offers or undertakes to prevent, diagnose, correct or treat, in any manner, by any means, method or device, any human disease, illness, pain, wound, fracture, infirmity, defect or abnormal physical or mental condition, injury, deformity or ailment, including the management of pregnancy and parturition; or

Attaches the title of M.D., D.O., P.A., physician, surgeon, osteopathic physician or osteopathic surgeon, doctor, physician assistant or any other words, letters or abbreviations or any combination thereof when used in the conduct of any occupation or profession pertaining to the prevention, diagnosis or treatment of human disease or condition unless the designation additionally contains the description of another branch of the healing arts for which one holds a valid license in this state; or

Practices osteopathy; or

Offers or undertakes to prescribe, order, give or administer drugs which can only be obtained by prescription according to law; or

Renders a determination of medical necessity or appropriateness of proposed treatment.

“Reactivation” after a license has lapsed means the completion of all requirements set forth in W.S. 33-26-305(c);

Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 80, § 3.

“USMLE” means the United States medical licensing examination;

“L.C.M.E.” means the liaison committee on medical education;

“A.C.G.M.E.” means accreditation council for graduate medical education;

“Fifth pathway” means an academic year of supervised clinical education provided by an L.C.M.E. accredited medical school to students who have:

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 190, § 3.

Studied at a medical school outside of the United States, Puerto Rico or Canada;

Completed all of the formal requirements of the foreign medical school, except internship or social service;

Attained a score satisfactory to the sponsoring medical school on a screening examination; and

Passed the foreign medical graduate examination in the medical sciences, parts I and II of the examination of the national board of medical examiners, or steps 1 and 2 of the USMLE.

“FLEX examination” means the federation of state medical boards licensing examination;

“R.C.P.S.C.” means the royal college of physicians and surgeons of Canada;

“Physician-patient relationship” means a relationship between a licensee and any person formed for the purpose of the licensee providing medical diagnosis or treatment to the person, whether or not for compensation;

“This act” means the Medical Practice Act;

“Board counsel” means an attorney designated by the board to provide legal counsel to the board and its staff in the conduct of the board’s business;

“Board prosecutor” means an attorney designated by the board to prosecute, and to provide legal counsel to interviewers and petitioners in, disciplinary cases pending before the board pursuant to this act and the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

“COMLEX” means the comprehensive osteopathic medical licensing examination, administered by the national board of osteopathic medical examiners;

“Condition” means a specific requirement or prohibition imposed by any medical licensing board of any jurisdiction, or by any health care facility on an applicant’s or licensee’s clinical privileges at that facility, that shall be fulfilled by an applicant or licensee in order to obtain or continue to hold a license in that jurisdiction, or clinical privileges at that facility;

“E.C.F.M.G.” means the educational commission for foreign medical graduates;

“Restriction” means a limitation placed by any medical licensing board of any jurisdiction on an applicant’s or licensee’s scope of practice in that jurisdiction, or by any health care facility on an applicant’s or licensee’s clinical privileges at that facility;

“SPEX examination” means the federation of state medical boards special purpose post-licensure competency examination;

“Telemedicine” means the practice of medicine by electronic communication or other means from a physician in a location to a patient in another location, with or without an intervening health care provider.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 45, § 7; C.S. 1910, § 2871; C.S. 1920, § 3519; R.S. 1931, § 86-107; C.S. 1945, § 37-2007; W.S. 1957, § 33-327; W.S. 1977, §

33-26-101

; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 143, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, §§ 2, 3; 2009, ch. 201, § 1; 2018 ch. 80, § 3, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 81, § 2, effective January 1, 2022.

The 2009 amendment,

substituted “who is unable to” for “who cannot” in (a)(vii); rewrote (a)(vii)(D) which read “Chemical impairment”; substituted “licensing examination” for “post-licensure competency examination” at the end of (a)(xviii); added (a)(xxii) through (a)(xxix); and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, repealed former (a)(xiii), which read: “‘Sexual misconduct’” means: (A) Any behavior by a licensee which involves offers of exchange of medical services for some form of sexual gratification; (B) Sexual contact that occurs concurrent with the physician-patient relationship; or (C) Any behavior by a licensee toward a patient, former patient, another licensee, an employee of a health care facility, an employee of the licensee or a relative or guardian of a patient that exploits the position of trust, knowledge, emotions or influence of the licensee.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective January 1, 2022, in (a)(xi)(C), added "P.A.," and "physician assistant."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Naturopathy is simply one of the methods of practicing medicine. —

The practice of what is now called naturopathy has from time immemorial, at least to the extent then known, been considered simply as an integral part of the practice of medicine. Hahn v. State, 78 Wyo. 258, 322 P.2d 896,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1958).

It cannot be regarded as a separate and distinct profession. —

Our statute is clear, that the practice of naturopathy cannot be regarded as a separate and distinct profession like that of dentistry for instance, nor can any good reason be given why the legislature may not for the benefit of society require that those who practice the healing art should know and keep up with the improvements and advanced learning in that art. Hahn v. State, 78 Wyo. 258, 322 P.2d 896,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1958).

And legislature had perfect right to refuse to make special regulations. —

It is true that the legislature has licensed dentists and chiropractors and other persons who in some manner attempt to exercise part of the healing art, but simply because the legislature made special regulations for these groups did not require it to make similar regulations concerning naturopaths. It had a perfect right to refuse to provide such regulations relating to them. Hahn v. State, 78 Wyo. 258, 322 P.2d 896,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1958).

And require practitioner to have been admitted to practice as a physician or surgeon. —

The health and well-being of the members of society is too important to justify the failure to make requirements commensurate with the advancement of civilization. There is nothing to prohibit the practice of naturopathy provided that under our statute the practitioner has the learning of a physician and surgeon and has been admitted to practice as such in this state. Such a requirement is valid. Hahn v. State, 78 Wyo. 258, 322 P.2d 896,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1958).

Chiropractor's use of clinical nutrition methods.

A licensed chiropractor does not violate the Medical Practice Act by diagnosing a disease and by then treating the patient by the application of clinical nutritional methods; such practices constitute the practice of “chiropractic” under §

33-10-101

.Johnson v. State ex rel. Wyoming Bd. of Med., 986 P.2d 157,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1999).

Chiropractor who diagnosed and treated his grandson's strep throat with nutritional supplements was not “practicing medicine”. Johnson v. State ex rel. Wyoming Bd. of Med., 986 P.2d 157,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1999).

Dentist unauthorized to practice general nondental anesthesiology. —

A person licensed to practice dentistry in Wyoming who has special training and experience in the field of general anesthesia, but is not a licensed physician in Wyoming, is not authorized to practice general anesthesiology for nondental purposes. The restrictive language as used by the legislature in the Wyoming Dental Practice Act limits those licensed by that act to the practice of anesthesiology solely for purposes in connection with the oral cavity region. Also, the practice of general nondental anesthesiology is considered the “practice of medicine” as defined by the Paravecchio v. Memorial Hosp., 742 P.2d 1276,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1987), reh'g denied,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 523

(Wyo. Oct. 7, 1987), overruled in part, Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2004 WY 92, 95 P.3d 794,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2004).

Scope of license to practice medicine or surgery. —

The practice of medicine, in its broadest sense, is the art of healing disease and preserving health, and the license to practice medicine or surgery generally entitles the licensee to practice medicine or surgery in all the various branches and to use any method for treatment and healing human ailments, although others may be authorized to practice in limited fields of the general practice. State v. Catellier, 63 Wyo. 123, 179 P.2d 203,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1947).

Exceeding scope of license as violation. —

A person licensed as a chiropodist who administered a general anesthetic and set a dislocated shoulder was held to have violated this section, defining the practice of medicine. State v. Catellier, 63 Wyo. 123, 179 P.2d 203,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1947).

Authorized use of term. —

A licensed chiropractor's use of the term “chiropractic physician” does not violate the Medical Practice Act. Johnson v. State ex rel. Wyoming Bd. of Medicine, 986 P.2d 157,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1999).

Prohibited practices. —

Practicing medicine and receiving compensation therefor and practicing medicine without a license are separate offenses under this section. Hahn v. State, 78 Wyo. 258, 322 P.2d 896,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1958).

Matter of sentence in discretion of trial court. —

Matter of sentence in a prosecution under this section for practicing without a license is addressed to the sound discretion of trial court. Hahn v. State, 78 Wyo. 258, 322 P.2d 896,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1958).

Stated

in

Kirbens v. Wyoming State Bd. of Med., 992 P.2d 1056,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

See note, “What Constitutes the Practice of Medicine in Wyoming,” 13 Wyo. L.J. 259.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutionality and construction of statutes or regulations prohibiting one who has no license to practice medicine from owning, maintaining, or operating an office therefor, 20 ALR2d 808.

Illegal practice of medicine under statute, ordinance, or other measure involving chemical treatment of public water supply, 43 ALR2d 453.

Hypnotism as illegal practice of medicine, 85 ALR2d 1128.

Single or isolated transaction as falling within provisions of licensing requirements, 93 ALR2d 90.

Practicing medicine, surgery, dentistry, optometry, podiatry, or other healing arts without license as a separate or continuing offense, 99 ALR2d 654.

Acupuncture as illegal practice of medicine, 72 ALR3d 1257.

Right of medical patient to obtain, or physician to prescribe, Laetrile for treatment of illness, 5 ALR4th 219.

Regulation of practice of acupuncture, 17 ALR4th 964.

Standard of care owed to patient by medical specialist as determined by local, “like community,” state, national, or other standards, 18 ALR4th 603.

§ 33-26-103.
Applicability of chapter.

This chapter does not apply to:

Persons rendering medical assistance without compensation at the scene of an emergency;

Medical students trained in an L.C.M.E. or A.O.A. accredited or board approved school of medicine serving as clinical clerks, residents or interns under the supervision of a physician licensed in this state;

Commissioned medical officers of the United States armed services and medical officers of the United States public health service or the United States department of veterans affairs in the discharge of their official duties or within federally controlled facilities or enclaves, provided that the persons who are licensees of the board shall be subject to the provisions of this act and further provided that all such persons shall be the holder of a full and unrestricted license to practice medicine in one (1) or more jurisdictions of the United States;

Any individual residing in and licensed in good standing to practice medicine in another state or country brought into this state for consultation by a physician licensed to practice medicine in this state, provided the physician licensed in this state notifies the board of the consultation in compliance with regulations adopted by the board;

Any individual licensed to practice medicine in another state who comes to this state to remove human organs from brain-dead persons;

The treatment of disease, injury, deformity or ailments by prayer or spiritual means provided that federal and state health and sanitation laws, rules and regulations are not violated;

The gratuitous domestic administration of family remedies;

Health care providers licensed under any other chapter of this title engaged in the practice of the profession for which he is licensed;

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 190, § 3.

Any person who does not represent himself to be a licensed health care professional who offers health care advice or nonprescription medicine to another person in a social or educational situation in any manner otherwise lawful.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 8, § 13; R.S. 1899, § 2201; Laws 1905, ch. 45, § 13; C.S. 1910, § 2877; C.S. 1920, § 3525; Laws 1925, ch. 126, § 4; 1931, ch. 34, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 86-113; C.S. 1945, § 37-2013; Laws 1957, ch. 142. § 3; W.S. 1957, § 33-341; Laws 1973, ch. 223, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-140; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1989, ch. 53, § 1; 1991, ch. 143, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2009, ch. 201, § 1.

Cross references. —

For the Wyoming Emergency Medical Services Act, see chapter 36 of this title.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(iii), substituted “service or” for “service of.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2009 amendment,

substituted “United States Department of veterans affairs” for “veterans administration of the United States” in (a)(iii); and, in (a)(iv), inserted “in good standing,” substituted “brought into this state” for “called into this state,” and added the proviso at the end.

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-26-102(a)(xxi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Family remedy exemption. —

Mother's administration of nutritional supplements to her child as treatment for strep throat, as recommended by the child's chiropractor grandfather, together with the grandfather's reporting of that treatment to the school, were exempt from the Family Medical Practices Act under the family remedy exemption. Johnson v. State ex rel. Wyoming Bd. of Med., 986 P.2d 157,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1999).